Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Investment of State Funds
§ 9-4-717.
Additional investment matters.

The state treasurer may form entities required in the general practice employed by banks and brokerage firms for the purpose of designating a “nominee name” in securities transactions.

The state treasurer may offer and pay a reasonable premium for bonds and other securities. The purchase price shall not exceed the market value of the bonds or other securities at the time of purchase. The premium paid for the investments shall be amortized over the life of the investment to the fund or account from which the premium was paid.

The state treasurer directly, or investment managers of state funds, may effect sales or exchanges of investments of state funds, whenever the sale or exchange will result in a loss of principal, if the sale or exchange tends to maximize the total return on the funds invested and is otherwise consistent with implementation of the state investment policy established by the board under W.S.

9-4-716

.

As part of the state investment strategy, the state treasurer may retain the services of a custodial bank or an independent securities lending agent to supervise a program of securities lending in exchange for a fee or other consideration. Supervision of the program shall include:

Procedures to review the creditworthiness of all borrowers;

Requirements for full collateralization of all loans; and

Other methods and procedures required by the board for securing the lending program.

In making any new investment of state funds under this act or investing state or other funds as otherwise authorized by law, the state treasurer shall consult with the designated chief investment officer or the officer’s designee.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 1; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

The 2020 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 9-4-718.
Investment managers.

The state treasurer may contract with investment managers and pay for investment services and investment advice subject to the following conditions:

All fees and other costs of contracting for and using the services of an investment manager, except transaction costs and custodial fees, shall be accounted for on at least a quarterly basis;

Without the approval of the board:

No contract with an investment manager shall permit that manager to manage more than fifteen percent (15%) of the total portfolio of state funds available for investment at the time the contract is executed; and

No investment manager under contract with the state treasurer shall be permitted to act as a securities broker with respect to transactions involving state investments managed by such investment manager, unless the transaction can be made without incurring commission or market impact cost.

The amount of state funds under contract with an investment manager shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assets managed by that investment manager;

Investment managers shall be selected based upon a competitive process and with consideration given to the historical performance of prospective managers. No investment manager shall be hired unless approved by a majority vote of the board in consultation with the investment funds committee created by this act. The contract with an investment manager may be terminated by a majority vote of the board;

Investment managers shall be paid on a negotiated flat fee or performance basis based upon net assets invested;

Contracts with investment managers shall be subject to cancellation upon receipt of thirty (30) days notice by either party;

The state treasurer shall not contract with any person as an investment manager under this subsection unless that person or that person’s firm has prior to the execution of the contract, a verifiable CFA Institute (Chartered Financial Analyst Institute) compliant track record of at least five (5) years with respect to the type of investments regarding which the investment manager will provide services or the investment manager is employed by an organized and chartered bank trust company with trust assets in excess of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00). Any prospective manager shall submit to the state treasurer audited financial statements in accordance with the treasurer’s rules and regulations and a certified record of the manager’s past investment performance prepared by an independent entity;

Each investment manager shall at least quarterly provide a report to the state treasurer describing the manager’s performance relative to mutually agreed upon industry indices and reflecting all brokerage fees and other fees or expenses paid by or fees earned by the manager which are paid by the state under the contract.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 11, § 2.

The state treasurer may contract for services to select an investment manager.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 1; 2015 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed former (b), which read: “Investment managers retained for management of traditional assets shall be a registered investment advisor under the Investment Advisor's Act of 1940. Investment managers retained for management of alternative investments are not required to be a registered investment advisor under the Investment Advisor's Act of 1940.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iv) added “in consultation with the investment funds committee created by this act” at the end of the second sentence.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 9-4-719.
Investment earnings spending policy permanent funds.

The purpose of this section is to establish a spending policy for earnings on permanent fund investments to provide, in descending order of importance:

Consistent, sustainable flow of earnings for expenditure over time;

Protection of the corpus of the permanent funds against inflation; and

To the extent practicable, increases in earnings available for expenditure to offset the effects of inflation.

There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the account. Beginning July 1, 2021 for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, revenues in this account in excess of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 and for each fiscal year thereafter:

As soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year, after making any other transfers provided by law from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account, but prior to calculating the balance of the account under this subsection, the state treasurer shall transfer from the account an amount equal to the difference between the maximum amount which may be credited to the strategic investments and project account pursuant to subsection (q) of this section and the amount actually credited to that account in the applicable fiscal year;

As soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year, the state treasurer shall perform an annual reconciliation of the quarterly pro-rata payments to the general fund under this subsection. If the reconciliation reveals an excess in payments to the general fund, the treasurer shall pay the excess amount from the general fund to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account. If the reconciliation reveals a shortfall in payments to the general fund, the treasurer shall pay the shortfall amount from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account to the general fund.

The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, in excess of the spending policy established in subsection (d) of this section are appropriated from the general fund to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account. The appropriation shall be credited to the account as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.

The annual spending policy for the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund is for each fiscal year (FY):

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 80, § 2.

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 9, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 80, § 2.

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 148 § 2.

There is created the common school permanent fund reserve account. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the account. Beginning July 1, 2017 for fiscal year 2018 and each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer unobligated funds from this account to the common school account within the permanent land income fund as necessary to ensure that an amount equal to the spending policy amount established in subsection (h) of this section is available for expenditure annually during the fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2017, revenues in this account in excess of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the spending policy amount shall be credited to the common school account within the permanent land fund.

There is annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund reserve account an amount determined under this subsection from funds as provided in W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi). The amount shall be computed and calculated by the state treasurer. The amount shall be equal to the extent to which earnings from the common school account within the permanent land fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iv) exceed the spending policy established in subsection (h) of this section for that fiscal year. The appropriation shall be credited to the account as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.

The annual spending policy for the common school account within the permanent land fund is for each fiscal year (FY):

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 80, § 2.

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 9, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 80, § 2.

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the account, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 148 § 2.

There is created the excellence in higher education endowment reserve account. Interest and other earnings on funds within the account shall be credited to the account. As soon as possible after the end of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2017, revenues in this account in excess of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (o) of this section shall be credited to the excellence in higher education endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vi).

The earnings from the excellence in higher education endowment fund during each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, in excess of the spending policy amount established in subsection (o) of this section shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the excellence in higher education endowment reserve account. The excess earnings shall be credited to the reserve account as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.

To the extent the spending policy amount established in subsection (o) of this section exceeds earnings from the excellence in higher education endowment fund for the prior fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute from the excellence in higher education reserve account an amount equal to one-half (1/2) the difference, and such amounts are continuously appropriated from the reserve account for that purpose. Any funds distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be distributed no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year and shall be distributed and expended as provided in W.S.

21-16-1201

through

21-16-1203

for earnings from the excellence in higher education endowment fund. The state treasurer in consultation with the University of Wyoming and community college commission, shall report to the governor, joint appropriations interim committee, joint education interim committee and select committee on capital financing and investments no later than November 1, of any year in which funds have been or are anticipated to be distributed from the reserve account under this subsection.

The annual spending policy amount for the excellence in higher education endowment is as follows:

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the excellence in higher education endowment fund, as calculated from the first day of the fiscal year.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

Annually, not later than November 1, the state treasurer, in consultation with the state loan and investment board, shall provide a recommendation to the select committee on capital financing and investments regarding modifications to the spending policy amounts contained in this section. The recommendations shall be consistent with the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this section. The select committee on capital financing and investments shall annually submit a recommendation to all members of the legislature before the convening of the session regarding modifications to the spending policy amounts.

The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, which are less than the spending policy established in subsection (d) of this section are appropriated from the general fund subject to subsection (s) of this section and the following:

Any earnings in excess of two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year and less than or equal to the spending policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section shall be credited to the legislative stabilization reserve account created by W.S.

9-4-219

and the strategic investments and projects account created by W.S.

9-4-220

in equal amounts;

The appropriations in this subsection shall be credited to the designated account as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 2; ch. 206, § 2.

In any fiscal year or fiscal biennium funds to be deposited to an account under subsection (q) of this section may be deposited to a different fund or account as specified by a general appropriations bill for state government as determined by the legislature to be necessary to alleviate a budget shortfall or structural budget deficit as defined by W.S.

9-2-1002

, or to provide appropriations to maintain services as determined by the legislature.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 14, § 1; 2001, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 177, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 80, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2; ch. 40, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 102, § 1; ch. 113 § 3; 2011, ch. 10, § 1; 2012, ch. 22, § 1; 2015 ch. 195, § 2, effective March 10, 2015; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 206, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 134, § 334(a), effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 55, § 1, effective March 11, 2020; 2020 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 144, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 9, §§ 1 and 2, rewrote (d) and (h), modifying spending policy amounts from investments of permanent Wyoming mineral trust funds and the common school account within the permanent land fund, respectively, and repealing obsolete provisions.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, in (b), deleted the second sentence which formerly read: “The state treasurer shall transfer funds from this account to the general fund as necessary to ensure that the spending policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section is available for expenditure annually during each fiscal year”; and in (f) deleted the second sentence, which formerly read: “The state treasurer shall transfer funds from this account to the common school account within the permanent land income fund as necessary to ensure that the spending policy amount specified in subsection (h) of this section is available for expenditure annually during each fiscal year.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given efect in this section as set out above.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in the first sentences in (b) and (f); and updated references to W.S.

9-4-204

in (c) and (g).

The 2007 amendment

repealed former (e) and (j), which pertained to recommendations by the state treasurer in consultation with the state loan and investment board to the select committee on capital financing and investments regarding modification to spending policies; and added (k) and (m).

The 2008 amendment,

in (g), deleted “from the general fund” following “annually appropriated,” and added “from funds as provided in W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi)” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 102, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (n), substituted “November 1” for “October 1”; and in (p), substituted “November 1” for “September 30.”

The 2012 amendment,

added the present second sentence in (k).

The 2015 amendment,

in (b) and (f), added the second sentence and substituted “ninety percent (90%)” for “seventy-five percent (75%)” in the last sentence; created new subsections (q) and (r).

Laws 2015, ch. 195, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2015.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by
ch. 78 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in the second sentence of (b), substituted “two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund” for “the spending policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section” following “equal to,” and deleted “reduced by the amount credited to the legislative stabilization reserve account and the strategic investments and projects account by subsection (q) of this section” preceding “is available.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 118 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, in the introductory language for (q), inserted “subsection(s) of this section and” following “subject to”; and added (s).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (r).

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b) substituted “after-July 1, 2017” for “after-July 1, 2000,” and “one hundred fifty percent (150%)” for “ninety percent (90%);” in (d)(v) substituted “FY 2018...2020” for “FY 2004 and each fiscal year thereafter,” added (d)(vi) and (d)(vii); in (f) substituted “July 1, 2017” for “July 1, 2015” and “year 2018” for “year 2016,”substituted “the spending policy…of this section” for “two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the common school account within the permanent land fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year;” in (h)(v) substituted “FY 2018…2020” for “FY 2004 and each fiscal year thereafter,” added (h)(vi) and (h)(vii); in (k) substituted “July 1, 2017” for “July 1, 2006” and “one hundred fifty percent (150%)” for “seventy-five percent (75%);” in (n) added “one-half (1/2);” in (o) substituted “is as follows…(FY)” for “fund shall be,” in (o)(i) added “FY 2018” and deleted the last sentence pertaining to FYs 2007 through 2010, added (o)(ii), and made related changes.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 206, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (r).

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment,
effective July 1, 2018, in (q)(i), added “Except as provided
in paragraph (iii) of this subsection” at the beginning; and
added (q)(iii).

The second
2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “after
making any transfer required pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection”
following “after July 1, 2017” in the third sentence
and added the final sentence; and added (b)(i).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (b), substituted "2020" for "2021," and in (b)(i), substituted "the maximum amount which may be credited to the strategic investments and project account pursuant to subsection (q) of this section and" for "the full amount to be credited to the school major maintenance subaccount pursuant to W.S. 9-4-220(b)(i) and," and "account" for "subaccount"; in (d)(v), substituted "FY 2020 and each fiscal year through 2022" for "FY 2018, 2019 and 2020," in (d)(vi), substituted "FY 2023" for "FY 2021," and in (d)(vii), substituted "FY 2024" for "FY 2022"; in (h)(v), substituted "FY 2020 and each fiscal year through 2024" for "FY 2018, 2019 and 2020," in (h)(vi), substituted "FY 2025" for "FY 2021," and in (h)(vii), substituted "FY 2026" for "FY 2022."

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 55, § 1, in the introductory language of (b) added the second sentence; and in (f) added the second sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 55, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (f) added the second sentence.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (b), substituted "2021" for "2016," "2022" for "2017," added "to the extent funds are available" following "thereafter," "on a quarterly, pro-rata basis" following "general fund," deleted "annually" following "expenditure," and substituted "paragraphs (i) and (ii)" for "paragraph (i)" in the third sentence; and added (b)(ii).

The second 2021 amendment, by, ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "as follows" following "trust fund is" in (d); deleted "FY 2020 and each fiscal year through 2022" at the beginning of (d)(v); deleted "as follows" following "fund is" in (h); deleted "FY 2020 and each fiscal year through 2024" at the beginning of (h)(v); deleted "for each fiscal year (FY)" at the end of (o); deleted "FY 2018" at the beginning of (o)(i); deleted "Except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection," at the beginning of (q)(i); and made related changes.

The third 2021 amendment, by, ch. 144, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (d)(vi), which read, "FY 2023 – an amount equal to four and three-fourths percent (4.75%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year"; repealed (d)(vii), which read, "FY 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter – an amount equal to four and one-half percent (4.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year"; repealed (h)(vi), which read, "FY 2025 – an amount equal to four and three-fourths percent (4.75%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the account, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year"; repealed (h)(vii), which read, "FY 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter – an amount equal to four and one-half percent (4.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the account, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year"; repealed (o)(ii), which read, "FY 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter - an amount equal to four and three-fourths percent (4.75%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the excellence in higher education endowment fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year"; and repealed (q)(iii), which read, "For fiscal year 2019, funds directed to the strategic investments and projects account under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be credited as follows and in priority order with the first priority fully funded before deposits to the subsequent priority: (A) An amount equal to nine thousand three hundred seventy-five ten-thousandths percent (0.9375%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the first day of the fiscal year, to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account; (B) An amount equal to three thousand one hundred twenty-five ten-thousandths percent (0.3125%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the first day of the fiscal year, to the strategic investments and projects account."

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 65, § 1, and Laws 2000, ch. 14, § 1, both enacted §

9-4-712

. This section was subsequently redesignated as §

9-4-713

by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This section was formerly compiled as W.S.

9-4-713

.

The Revisor’s Bill, Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “ Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides: “To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 303, appropriates from the budget reserve account to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund $50,000,000, effective immediately. It further appropriates from the budget reserve account to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, $25,000,000, which shall not be deposited until June 30, 2005, and shall only be deposited if the legislature enacts further legislation requiring the deposit. It is intended that the legislature shall further act only after the legislature has determined that funding requirements for Medicaid programs, school capital construction programs and correctional facility capital construction programs are adequate. Finally, it appropriates from the budget reserve account to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund $25,000,000, which shall not be deposited until June 30, 2006, and shall only be deposited if the legislature enacts further legislation requiring the deposit (see the caveat regarding the deposit for June 30, 2005).

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 304, appropriates from the general fund to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account created by
W.S. 9-4-713(b) $44,500,000, and from the school foundation program account to the common school permanent fund reserve account created by
W.S. 9-4-713(f) $30,000,000. These appropriations were only to be effective if 2004 Senate File 0032 was enacted into law. Senate File 0032 was enacted into law law Laws 2004, ch. 40.

Laws 2008, ch. 102, §
2, provides: “There is annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund reserve account an amount determined under this subsection from funds as provided in W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi). The amount shall be computed and calculated by the state treasurer. The amount shall be equal to the extent to which earnings from the common school account within the permanent land fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iv) exceed the spending policy established in subsection (h) of this section for that fiscal year. The appropriation shall be credited to the account as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.”

Laws 2008, ch. 102, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2000, ch. 14, § 3, provides: “The select committee on capital financing and investments shall submit a recommendation to the legislature, including draft legislation, regarding the establishment of a spending policy under W.S. 9-4-713(d) and (h) for fiscal years following fiscal year 2004. This recommendation shall be submitted no later than the convening of the 2004 session.”

§ 9-4-720.
Investment funds committee created; duties.

There is created the investment funds committee. The committee consists of seven (7) voting members including the state treasurer and six (6) members appointed by a selection panel in accordance with W.S.

9-4-721

. In addition to the voting members, there shall be one (1) ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the governor, one (1) ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the president of the senate and one (1) ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The designated chief investment officer and the chief investment officer of the Wyoming retirement system shall also be ex officio nonvoting members.

The ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the governor shall serve for the term of office of the governor but may be removed by the governor. The ex officio nonvoting members appointed by the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives shall serve two (2) year terms but are eligible for reappointment and may be removed by the officer appointing the member.

The voting members appointed by a selection panel shall serve a three (3) year term. The voting members are eligible for reappointment. Terms of appointment for voting members shall commence on March 1 of the year of appointment. Any appointed voting member of the committee may be removed by the selection panel at any time or may be removed by the governor for malfeasance or misconduct in office. If an appointed voting position on the committee becomes vacant for any reason, the selection panel shall appoint a member in accordance with W.S.

9-4-721

to fill the position for the remainder of the unexpired term. Appointed voting members of the investment funds committee shall be confirmed by the senate. The selection panel may fill any vacancy occurring between sessions of the legislature by temporary appointment.

The state treasurer shall be the chairman of the committee. The committee shall hold not less than four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year. Special meetings may be called by the chairman and shall be called by the chairman upon a written request submitted by a majority of the voting members. All matters shall be decided by a majority vote of a quorum of the voting members of the committee, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Meeting facilities, secretarial or clerical assistance, supplies and such other assistance as the committee may require in the performance of its duties shall be provided by the office of the state treasurer. Members of the committee who are not employees or elected officials of the state of Wyoming shall be paid expenses in the manner and amount prescribed for state employees under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for each day of attending and traveling to and from meetings and other activities necessary to the performance of the duties of the committee.

The committee shall:

Review state investment policies and procedures and recommend statutory, rule or policy modifications as the committee deems appropriate to maximize total net returns while protecting principal in a manner that strives for the highest possible risk adjusted total return consistent with an appropriate level of safety, liquidity and consideration of the unique circumstances for each fund;

Consult with the state treasurer and the board as required by law and as requested by each of those entities regarding the establishment and execution of state investment policies;

Monitor the investment of state funds in alternative investments;

Report to the legislature’s select committee on capital financing and investments regarding state investment policies, procedures, authority and execution of the same upon request;

Establish or approve investment benchmarks and determine or review whether benchmarks have been exceeded as required by W.S. 9-1-409(e) and 9-3-406(a). Ex officio nonvoting members of the committee shall not vote on any benchmark.

The committee through the state treasurer’s office may contract with consultants having special expertise to assist in the performance of its duties.

Liability of committee members shall be governed by W.S.

1-23-107

.

History.

2017 ch. 202, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2019 ch. 57, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2021 ch. 151, § 1, effective April 12, 2021.

The 2019 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2019, ch. 57, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature February 19, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

in (a) substituted “seven (7) voting members” for “six (6) voting members,” “the designated chief investment officer” for “a member of the state treasurer's office designated by the state treasurer,” and “four (4) members appointed” for “three (3) members appointed”; in (c) substituted “voting members” for “three (3) voting members” throughout and deleted “provided that of the initial committee, one (1) member shall be appointed for a one (1) year term, one (1) member for a two (2) year term and one (1) member for a three (3) year term” at the end of the first sentence; in (d) substituted “hold not less than four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year” for “meet at least quarterly and at the call of either the chairman or a majority of the membership” and added the third and fourth sentences; in (e) substituted “Meeting facilities, secretarial or clerical assistance, supplies and such other assistance as the committee may require in the performance of its duties shall be” for “Staff and support for the committee shall be,” “shall be paid expenses” for “shall receive per diem and travel expense reimbursement,” and “prescribed for state employees under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for each day of attending and traveling to and from meetings and other activities necessary to the performance of the duties of the committee” for “prescribed for legislators under W.S.

28-5-101

”; redesignated (f) as the introductory language of (f) and (f)(v); in the introductory language of (f) deleted “In addition to the duties prescribed under this act” at the beginning; added (f)(i) through (f)(iv), and made related changes; in(f)(v) deleted the last sentence, which read “The committee through the state treasurer's office may engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional assistance and advice in establishing and evaluating benchmarks”; and added (g) and (h).

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2021 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), deleted “, the designated chief investment officer, the chief investment officer of the Wyoming retirement system” following “state treasurer,” substituted “six (6)” for “four (4),” in the second sentence, deleted “and” following “by the governor,” substituted “president of the senate and one (1) ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives” for “management council,” added the last sentence; rewrote the second sentence of (b), which read, “The ex officio nonvoting member appointed by the management council shall serve a two (2) year term but is eligible for reappointment and may be removed by the management council”; and substituted “Ex officio nonvoting members of the committee” for “Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, members of the committee appointed by the governor or the management council may vote on benchmarks.
A member of the committee who is also an employee or board member of the state treasurer's office or the Wyoming retirement system” in (f)(v).

Laws 2021, ch. 151, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 12, 2021.